Ohio, session 136, HB542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 341.28, 753.34, and 5120.6511 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 341.28. (A) As used in this section, "county correctional facility" means a county jail, county workhouse, minimum security jail, joint city and county workhouse, municipal-county correctional center, multicounty-municipal correctional center, municipal-county jail or workhouse, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse. (B) Not later than the thirty-first day of December of each year, each county correctional facility shall report to the department of rehabilitation and correction the pregnancy outcome of each pregnant inmate who resided at the facility at the conclusion of the pregnancy. Sec. 753.34. (A) "Municipal correctional facility" means a municipal jail, municipal workhouse, minimum security jail, joint city and county workhouse, municipal-county correctional center, multicounty-municipal correctional center, municipal-county jail or workhouse, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse. (B) Not later than the thirty-first day of December of each year, each municipal correctional facility shall report to the department of rehabilitation and correction the pregnancy outcome of each pregnant inmate who resided at the facility at the conclusion of the pregnancy. Sec. 5120.6511. (A) As used in this section, "state correctional institution" has the same meaning as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Not later than the thirty-first day of December of each year, each state correctional institution shall report to the department of rehabilitation and correction the pregnancy outcome of each pregnant inmate in the custody of the department who resided at the institution at the conclusion of the pregnancy.